Connecticut, session 2026, SB00414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 13b-31h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Transportation shall develop, and thereafter
revise as necessary, guidelines governing tree and vegetation
management, removal and replacement along state highways for use by
its employees and contractors when undertaking maintenance and
construction projects. The goal of the guidelines shall be to ensure the
impacts of maintenance and construction projects on the environment,
landscape and noise pollution are balanced or outweighed by measures
taken to avoid and minimize the impacts.
(b) Such guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to,
provisions addressing (1) the safety of the traveling public; (2) general
roadside vegetation management activities performed by the
sSB414 / File No. 359 1

sSB414 File No. 359
department, including, but not limited to, mowing, herbicide
application, grassing, replanting with native species whenever
practicable, limb management, tree removal and debris removal; (3)
beautification, enhancements and the effect on scenic roads designated
pursuant to section 13b-31c; (4) visibility enhancement; and (5) the
environmental impact of such work, including (A) preventing invasive
tree, brush or plant species' growth and impact, (B) storm water run-off,
(C) erosion, (D) replanting of vegetation species to expand and improve
pollinator habitats, as described in section 22-90b, and (E) reduced
mowing. Such guidelines shall apply to construction projects financed,
in whole or in part, with federal funds to the extent such guidelines do
not conflict with federal laws and regulations.
(c) Such guidelines shall not apply to the removal of any trees or
vegetation necessary to maintain public safety or that is performed
because of a weather-related civil preparedness emergency declared
pursuant to section 28-9.
(d) [On or before January 1, 2024] Not later than February 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Transportation shall consider the results of the study
and recommendations conducted pursuant to section 63 of public act
24-151, as amended by this act, by the Department of Natural Resources
and the Environment at The University of Connecticut concerning the
carbon sequestration by trees and other vegetation along highways and
other areas in the state , and determine the need, if any, for revisions to
the guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If the
commissioner determines a revision to such guidelines is not warranted,
the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
transportation and the environment explaining the reasons for such
determination. If the commissioner revises such guidelines in response
to the results of such study, the commissioner shall submit such revised
guidelines to [the] such joint standing committees, [of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation and
the environment,] in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
sSB414 / File No. 359 2

sSB414 File No. 359
[The] Such joint standing committees shall hold a joint public hearing
on such revised guidelines and the commissioner shall present such
revised guidelines at the public hearing.
Sec. 2. Section 63 of public act 24-151 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Transportation shall provide a grant from
available resources to the Department of Natural Resources and the
Environment at The University of Connecticut for the purpose of
studying the carbon sequestration by trees and other vegetation along
highways and other areas in the state.
(b) The Department of Natural Resources and the Environment at
The University of Connecticut shall (1) submit an interim report, not
later than January 1, 2025, and a final report, not later than [July 1, 2025]
October 1, 2026, concerning the [department's findings] results of such
study and any recommendations to the Department of Transportation
and the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to transportation and the environment,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
and (2) present either or both such reports at a hearing held jointly by
said joint standing committees.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 13b-31h
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 PA 24-151, Sec. 63
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(d), "conducted pursuant to section 63 of public act 24-151,
as amended by this act" was moved to after "recommendations" and "in
response to the results of such study" was inserted in the third sentence
for clarity.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB414 / File No. 359 3

sSB414 File No. 359
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which has no fiscal impact, requires the Department of
Transportation (DOT) to consider whether any revisions are needed to
its vegetative management guidelines based on the results of a
forthcoming UConn study and to report to the Transportation and
Environment Committees, as specified in the bill. It is anticipated that
DOT has the expertise to meet the provisions of the bill within existing
resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sSB414 / File No. 359 4

sSB414 File No. 359
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 414
AN ACT CONCERNING VEGETATION MANAGEMENT GUIDELINES
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.